North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131A. Health Care Facilities Finance Act.
Article 1. Health Care Facilities Finance Act.
§ 131A-14.
Trust funds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Article, including, without limitation, fees, loan repayments, purchase price payments, rents, charges, insurance proceeds, condemnation awards and any other revenues and funds received in connection with any health care facilities, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Article. The resolution authorizing the issuance of, or any trust agreement securing, any bonds or notes may provide that any of such moneys may be temporarily invested pending the disbursement thereof and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes of this Article, subject to such regulations as this Article and such resolution or trust agreement may provide. Any such moneys may be invested as provided in

G.S. 159-30

, as it may be amended from time to time.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 1979, c. 54, s. 13; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§ 131A-15.
Remedies.

Any holder of bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this Article or any coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement or resolution, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State or granted hereunder or under such trust agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by the Commission pursuant to this Article, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this Article or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the Commission or by any officer thereof.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§ 131A-16.
Negotiable instruments.

All bonds and interest coupons appertaining thereto issued under this Article are hereby made investment securities within the meaning of and for all the purposes of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code as enacted in this State, whether or not they are of such form and character as to be investment securities under said Article 8, subject only to the provisions of the bonds pertaining to registration.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§ 131A-17.
Bonds or notes eligible for investment.

Bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this Article are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds or notes are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any State or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes or obligations of the State is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§ 131A-18.
Refunding bonds or notes.

The Commission is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding any bonds or notes then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this Article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds or notes and, if deemed advisable by the Commission, for any corporate purpose of the Commission, including, without limitation:

Constructing improvements, additions, extensions or enlargements of the health care facilities in connection with which the bonds or notes to be refunded shall have been issued, and

Paying all or any part of the cost of any additional health care facilities.

The issuance of such bonds or notes, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the Commission in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this Article which relate to the issuance of bonds or notes, insofar as such provisions may be appropriate therefor.

Refunding bonds or notes may be sold or exchanged for outstanding bonds or notes issued under this Article and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption or payment of such refunding bonds or notes, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, accrued interest and any redemption premium on the bonds or notes being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or in the trust agreement securing, such bonds or notes, to the payment of any interest on such refunding bonds or notes and any expenses in connection with such refunding, such proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America which shall mature or which shall be subject to redemption by the holders thereof, at the option of such holders, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be required for the purposes intended.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§ 131A-19.
Annual report.

The Commission shall, promptly following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities under this Article for the preceding year to the Governor, the State Auditor, the Secretary of Health and Human Services, the General Assembly, and the Local Government Commission. The Commission shall cause an audit of its books and accounts relating to its activities under this Article to be made at least once in each year by an independent certified public accountant and the cost thereof may be paid from any available moneys of the Commission.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2006-203, s. 71; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§ 131A-20.
Officers not liable.

No member or officer of the Commission shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his execution of any bonds or notes or the issuance thereof.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a); 2019-240, s. 27.1(a).

§ 131A-21.
Tax exemption.

The exercise of the powers granted by this Article will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the State and will promote their health and welfare. If bonds or notes are issued by the Commission to provide or improve a health care facility, then until the bonds or notes are retired, the facility for which bonds or notes are issued is exempt from property taxes to the extent provided in this section. If refunding bonds or notes are issued to refund bonds or notes issued to provide or improve a health care facility, the facility will continue to be exempt from property taxes as provided in this section until such time as the refunding bonds or notes are retired, provided that the final maturity of the refunding bonds or notes does not extend beyond the final maturity of the original bonds or notes.

Property may be exempt from property taxes as provided in this section if a timely application for the exemption is filed with the assessor of the county in which the property is located as required under

G.S. 105-282.1

. The property tax exemption under this section shall not exceed the lesser of the original principal amount of the bonds or notes or the assessed value for ad valorem tax purposes of the facility. If bonds or notes are issued to finance more than one health care facility, only that portion of the principal amount of the bonds or notes used to provide or improve the particular facility, including any allocable reserves and financing costs, may be considered for the purpose of determining the amount of the exemption allowable under this section. The exemption authorized by this section shall begin with the first full tax year of the taxpayer following the issuance of the bonds and notes. This section does not affect a health care facility’s eligibility for a property tax exemption under Subchapter II of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.

Any bonds or notes issued by the Commission under the provisions of this Article shall at all times be free from taxation by the State or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the State, excepting inheritance, estate, or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the bonds and notes, and franchise taxes. The interest on the bonds and notes is not subject to taxation as income.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 1995, c. 46, s. 12; 2000-20, s. 1; 2001-139, s. 10; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§ 131A-22.
Conflict of interest.

If any member, officer or employee of the Commission shall be interested either directly or indirectly, or shall be an officer or employee of or have an ownership interest in any firm or corporation interested directly or indirectly, in any contract with the Commission, such interest shall be disclosed to the Commission and shall be set forth in the minutes of the Commission, and the member, officer or employee having such interest therein shall not participate on behalf of the Commission in the authorization of any such contract.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a).

§ 131A-23.
Additional method.

The foregoing sections of this Article shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that the issuance of bonds or notes under the provisions of this Article need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds or notes.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§ 131A-24.
Liberal construction.

This Article, being necessary for the health and welfare of the people of the State, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§ 131A-25.
Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

Insofar as the provisions of this Article are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special laws, or parts thereof, the provisions of this Article shall be controlling.

History.

1975, c. 766, s. 1; 2019-240, s. 27.1(a), (b).

§§ 131A-26 through 131A-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.